North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131D. Inspection and Licensing of Facilities.
Article 1. Adult Care Homes.
§ 131D-4.5B.
Adult care home medication aides; training and competency evaluation requirements.

By January 1, 2012, the Division of Health Service Regulation shall develop a mandatory, annual in-service training program for adult care home medication aides on infection control, safe practices for injections and any other procedures during which bleeding typically occurs, and glucose monitoring. Each medication aide who successfully completes the in-service training program shall receive partial credit, in an amount determined by the Department, toward the continuing education requirements for adult care home medication aides established by the Commission pursuant to

G.S. 131D-4.5

.

Beginning October 1, 2013, an adult care home is prohibited from allowing staff to perform any unsupervised medication aide duties unless that individual has previously worked as a medication aide during the previous 24 months in an adult care home or successfully completed all of the following:

A five-hour training program developed by the Department that includes training and instruction in all of the following:

The key principles of medication administration.

The federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention guidelines on infection control and, if applicable, safe injection practices and procedures for monitoring or testing in which bleeding occurs or the potential for bleeding exists.

A clinical skills evaluation consistent with 10A NCAC 13F.0503 and 10A NCAC 13G.0503.

Within 60 days from the date of hire, the individual must have completed the following:

An additional 10-hour training program developed by the Department that includes training and instruction in all of the following:

The key principles of medication administration.

The federal Centers of Disease Control and Prevention guidelines on infection control and, if applicable, safe injection practices and procedures for monitoring or testing in which bleeding occurs or the potential for bleeding exists.

An examination developed and administered by the Division of Health Service Regulation in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

By October 1, 2012, the Division of Health Service Regulation shall develop and administer an examination for individuals seeking employment as a medication aide in an adult care home.

History.

2011-99, s. 5.

§ 131D-4.5C.
Adult care home supervisors; infection control training requirements.

The Department shall develop, in consultation with associations representing adult care home providers, model infection prevention and control policies and procedures that are consistent with accepted national standards and address the factors identified in

G.S. 131D-4.4

A(b)(1). The Department shall make these model infection prevention and control policies and procedures available to adult care homes on the Department’s internet website.

The Department shall develop a mandatory, annual course for adult care home supervisors on implementation of the model infection prevention and control policies and procedures developed by the Department in accordance with subsection (a) of this section. Each supervisor that successfully completes the mandatory infection control course shall receive credit, in an amount determined by the Department, toward the continuing education requirements for adult care home supervisors established by the Commission pursuant to

G.S. 131D-4.5

.

History.

2011-99, s. 5; 2021-189, s. 3.2(b).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-189, s. 3.2(c), provides: “By January 1, 2022, the Department of Health and Human Services shall do the following:

“(1) Develop and post to its internet website the model infection prevention and control policies and procedures required by

G.S. 131D-4.5

C(a), as enacted by subsection (b) of this section.

“(2) Develop the mandatory, annual course for adult care home supervisors required by

G.S. 131D-4.5

C(b), as enacted by subsection (b) of this section.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-189, s. 3.2(b), effective January 1, 2022, added subsection (a); designated the existing provisions as subsection (b); and substituted the present provisions of the first sentence of subsection (b) for “By December 1, 2011, the Department shall develop a mandatory, annual course for adult care home supervisors on federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention guidelines on infection control.”

§ 131D-4.6.
Licensure of special care units.

As used in this section, the term “special care unit” means a wing or hallway within an adult care home, or a program provided by an adult care home, that is designated especially for residents with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias, a mental health disability, or other special needs disease or condition as determined by the Medical Care Commission.

An adult care home that holds itself out to the public as providing a special care unit shall be licensed as such and shall, in addition to other licensing requirements for adult care homes, meet the standards established under rules adopted by the Medical Care Commission.

An adult care home that holds itself out to the public as providing a special care unit without being licensed as a special care unit is subject to licensure actions and penalties provided under Part 1 of this Article, as well as any other action permitted by law.

History.

1999-334, s. 1.1; 2009-462, s. 4(f).

Moratorium on Special Care Unit Licenses.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11G.3(a), (b), provides: “(a) For the period beginning July 1, 2017, and ending June 30, 2019, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Service Regulation, shall not issue any licenses for special care units as defined in

G.S. 131D-4.6

and
G.S. 131E-114. This prohibition shall not restrict the Department of Health and Human Services from doing any of the following:

“(1) Issuing a license to a facility that is acquiring an existing special care unit.

“(2) Issuing a license for a special care unit in any area of the State upon a determination by the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services that increased access to this type of care is necessary in that area during the moratorium imposed by this section.

“(3) Processing all completed applications for special care unit licenses received by the Division of Health Service Regulation along with the applicable license fee prior to June 1, 2013.

“(4) Issuing a license to a facility that was in possession of a certificate of need as of July 31, 2013, that included authorization to operate special care unit beds.

“(b) The Department of Health and Human Services shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division by March 1, 2019, containing at least the following information:

“(1) The number of licensed special care units in the State.

“(2) The capacity of the currently licensed special care units to serve people in need of their services.

“(3) The anticipated growth in the number of people who will need the services of a licensed special care unit.

“(4) The number of applications received from special care units seeking licensure as permitted by this section and the number of those applications that were not approved.” For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws
2015-241, s. 12G.2(a1).

§ 131D-4.7.
Adult care home specialist fund.

There is established the adult care home specialist fund. The fund shall be maintained in and by the Department for the purpose of assisting county departments of social services in paying salaries of adult care home specialists.

History.

1999-334, s. 1.1.

§ 131D-4.8.
Discharge of residents; appeals.

An adult care home may initiate discharge of a resident based on any of the following reasons:

The discharge is necessary to protect the welfare of the resident and the adult care home cannot meet the needs of the resident, as documented by the resident’s physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner.

The health of the resident has improved sufficiently so that the resident is no longer in need of the services provided by the adult care home, as documented by the resident’s physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner.

The safety of the resident or other individuals in the adult care home is endangered.

The health of the resident or other individuals in the adult care home is endangered, as documented by a physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner.

The resident has failed to pay the costs of services and accommodations by the payment due date specified in the resident’s contract with the adult care home, after receiving written notice of warning of discharge for failure to pay.

The discharge is mandated under this Article, Article 3 of this Chapter, or rules adopted by the Medical Care Commission.

Upon arrival at any adult care home, an individual must be identified to receive a discharge notice on behalf of the resident. An adult care home shall notify a resident, the resident’s legal representative, and the individual identified to receive a discharge notice of its intent to initiate the discharge of the resident under subsection (a) of this section, in writing, at least 30 days before the resident is discharged. The written notice shall include (i) the reasons for the discharge, (ii) an appropriate discharge destination if known, (iii) personal medical care information relating to the resident, as required by the Department, (iv) a copy of the Adult Care Home Notice of Discharge, (v) a copy of the Adult Care Home Hearing Request Form, and (vi) other information, as required under rules adopted by the Medical Care Commission. If a discharge is initiated under subdivision (a)(1) of this section on the basis that a resident’s physician requires a different level of care for the resident, the discharge is not subject to appeal for that specific reason unless there is a documented conflict between two or more of the resident’s physicians regarding the resident’s appropriate level of care but remains subject to appeal on all other available grounds.

During any appeal of a discharge to the Hearing Unit, if the Hearing Unit determines that the discharge destination identified in the written notice required by subsection (b) of this section does not include an appropriate discharge destination, the Department shall not prohibit discharge solely for that reason, provided that any discharge shall comply with subsection (e) of this section.

If an adult care home resident or the resident’s legal representative elects to appeal a discharge initiated by the adult care home, the appeal shall be to the Hearing Unit. The Hearing Unit shall decide all appeals pertaining to the discharge of adult care home residents. The decision of the Hearing Unit is the final agency decision. Any person aggrieved by a decision of the Hearing Unit pertaining to an adult care home resident discharge is entitled to immediate judicial review of the decision in Wake County Superior Court or in the superior court of the county where the person resides. The appellant shall file a petition for judicial review not later than 30 days after the person is served with a written copy of the Hearing Unit decision. Within 10 days after the petition for judicial review is filed with the superior court, the appellant shall serve copies of the petition by personal service or certified mail upon all parties who were parties of record to the appeal to the Hearing Unit. Other parties to the appeal to the Hearing Unit may file a response to the petition within 30 days after service. The Department as the decision maker in the appeal to the Hearing Unit is not a party of record. Within 30 days after receipt of a petition for judicial review, the Department shall transmit to the superior court the original or a certified copy of the official record in the appeal to the Hearing Unit, together with the final agency decision. In reviewing the Department’s final decision, the superior court shall review the official record, de novo, and make findings of fact and conclusions of law. The decision of the Department remains in effect during the pendency of review by the superior court and any further review in the appellate courts.

The facility shall convene the adult care home resident discharge team to assist with finding a placement for a resident if, at the time of notice of discharge, the destination is unknown, or the destination is not appropriate for the resident. The facility is not solely responsible for securing an appropriate discharge destination. Local management entities shall take the lead role for the discharge destination for those residents whose primary unmet needs are related to mental health, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse and who meet the criteria for the target population established by the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services. Local departments of social services shall take the lead role for those residents whose primary unmet needs are related to health, including Alzheimer’s disease and other forms of dementia, welfare, abuse, or neglect. When the adult care home resident discharge team is convened at the request of a facility, the adult care home resident discharge team shall consult with that facility, as well as the resident receiving the discharge notice and that resident’s legal representative. Upon the request of the resident or the resident’s legal representative, the Regional Long-Term Care Ombudsman shall serve as a member of the adult care home resident discharge team. The facility requesting the adult care home resident discharge team to be convened shall notify the resident and the resident’s legal representative of this right. The adult care home resident discharge team shall provide the Hearing Unit with the discharge location at or before the discharge hearing.

Meetings of the adult care home resident discharge team are not subject to the provisions of Article 33C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. All information and records acquired by the adult care home resident discharge team in the exercise of its duties are confidential unless all parties give written consent to the release of that information.

If a discharge is under appeal to the Hearing Unit, the resident shall remain in the facility and shall not be subject to discharge until issuance of the decision of the Hearing Unit with the following exceptions:

The discharge is necessary for the resident’s welfare and the resident’s needs cannot be met in the facility as documented by the resident’s physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner;

The safety of other individuals in the facility is endangered; [or]

The health of other individuals in the facility is endangered as documented by a physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner.

History.

2011-272, s. 4.

§ 131D-5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 637, s. 1.

§ 131D-6.
Certification of adult day care programs; purpose; definition; penalty.

It is the policy of this State to enable people who would otherwise need full-time care away from their own residences to remain in their residences as long as possible and to enjoy as much independence as possible. One of the programs that permits adults to remain in their residences and with their families is adult day care.

As used in this section “adult day care program” means the provision of group care and supervision in a place other than their usual place of abode on a less than 24-hour basis to adults who may be physically or mentally disabled, except that an adult day care program provider may provide overnight respite services on a 24-hour basis in accordance with

G.S. 131D-6.1

. The Department of Health and Human Services shall annually inspect and certify all adult day care programs, under rules adopted by the Social Services Commission. The Social Services Commission shall adopt rules to protect the health, safety, and welfare of persons in adult day care programs. These rules shall include minimum standards relating to management of the program, staffing requirements, building requirements, fire safety, sanitation, nutrition, and program activities. Adult day care programs are not required to provide transportation to participants; however, those programs that choose to provide transportation shall comply with rules adopted by the Commission for the health and safety of participants during transport.The Department of Health and Human Services shall enforce the rules of the Social Services Commission.

(b1)

An adult day care program that provides or that advertises, markets, or otherwise promotes itself as providing special care services for persons with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias, a mental health disability, or other special needs disease or condition shall provide the following written disclosures to the Department and to persons seeking adult day care program special care services:

A statement of the overall philosophy and mission of the adult day care program and how it reflects the special needs of participants with dementia.

The process and criteria for providing or discontinuing special care services.

The process used for assessment and establishment of the plan of care and its implementation, including how the plan of care is responsive to changes in the participant’s condition.

Staffing ratios and how they meet the participant’s need for increased special care and supervision.

Staff training that is dementia-specific.

Physical environment and design features that specifically address the needs of participants with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias.

Frequency and type of participant activities provided.

Involvement of families in special care and availability of family support programs.

Additional costs and fees to the participant for special care.

(b2)

As part of its certification renewal procedures and inspections, the Department shall examine for accuracy the written disclosure of each adult day care program subject to this section. Substantial changes to written disclosures shall be reported to the Department at the time the change is made.

(b3)

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting an adult day care program that does not advertise, market, or otherwise promote itself as providing special care services for persons with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias from providing adult day care services to persons with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias, a mental health disability, or other special needs disease or condition.

(b4)

As used in this section, the term “special care service” means a program, service, or activity designed especially for participants with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias, a mental health disability, or other special needs disease or condition as determined by the Medical Care Commission.

The Secretary may impose a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each violation on a person, firm, agency, or corporation who willfully violates any provision of this section or any rule adopted by the Social Services Commission pursuant to this section. Each day of a continuing violation constitutes a separate violation.In determining the amount of the civil penalty, the Secretary shall consider the degree and extent of the harm or potential harm caused by the violation.The Social Services Commission shall adopt rules concerning the imposition of civil penalties under this subsection.The clear proceeds of civil penalties imposed pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

(c1)

Any person, firm, agency, or corporation that harms or willfully neglects a person under its care is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

The following programs are exempted from the provisions of this section:

Those that care for three people or less;

Those that care for two or more persons, all of whom are related by blood or marriage to the operator of the facility; [and]

Those that are required by other statutes to be licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services.

History.

1985, c. 349, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 954; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-215, s. 77; 1999-334, s. 2.2; 2001-90, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 12G.3(b).

§ 131D-6.1.
Licensure to offer overnight respite; rules; enforcement.

As used in this section, “overnight respite services” means the provision of group care and supervision in a place other than their usual place of abode on a 24-hour basis for a specified period of time to adults who may be physically or mentally disabled in order to provide temporary relief for a caregiver and includes services provided by any facility certified to provide adult day care services pursuant to

G.S. 131D-6

, or adult day health services pursuant to 10A NCAC, Chapter 06, Subchapter S, or both. Overnight respite services may include the services of the adult day care program or the adult day health program.

Any facility described under subsection (a) of this section seeking to offer overnight respite services shall apply to the Department for licensure to offer a program of overnight respite services. The Department shall annually license facilities providing a program of overnight respite services under rules adopted by the Medical Care Commission pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. As part of the licensure process, the Division of Health Service Regulation shall inspect the construction projects associated with, and the operations of, each facility providing a program of overnight respite services for compliance with the rules adopted by the Medical Care Commission pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

The Medical Care Commission shall adopt rules governing the licensure of adult day care and adult day health facilities providing a program of overnight respite services in accordance with this section. The Medical Care Commission shall seek input from stakeholders before proposing rules for adoption as required by this subsection. The rules shall limit the provision of overnight respite services for each adult to (i) not more than 14 consecutive calendar days, and not more than 60 total calendar days, during a 365-day period or (ii) the amount of respite allowed under the North Carolina Innovations waiver or Community Alternatives Program for Disabled Adults (CAP/DA) waiver, as applicable. The rules shall include minimum requirements to ensure the health and safety of overnight respite participants. These requirements shall address all of the following:

Program management.

Staffing.

Building specifications.

Fire safety.

Sanitation.

Nutrition.

Enrollment.

Bed capacity limitations, which shall not exceed six beds in each adult day care program.

Medication management.

Program activities.

Personal care, supervision, and other services.

The Medical Care Commission shall, as necessary, amend the rules pertaining to the provision of respite care in adult care homes and family care homes to address each of the categories enumerated in subsection (c) of this section.

The Division of Health Service Regulation shall have the authority to enforce the rules adopted by the Medical Care Commission under subsections (c) and (d) of this section and shall be responsible for conducting annual inspections and investigating complaints pertaining to overnight respite services in facilities licensed to provide a program of overnight respite services.

Each facility licensed to provide a program of overnight respite services under this section shall periodically report the number of individuals served and the average daily census to the Division of Health Service Regulation on a schedule determined by the Division.

The Division of Health Service Regulation is authorized to do both of the following with respect to a facility licensed to provide overnight respite services under this section in a manner that complies with the provisions of

G.S. 131D-2.7

:

Suspend admissions to programs of overnight respite services in facilities licensed to provide these services.

Suspend or revoke a facility’s license to provide a program of overnight respite services.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a facility licensed to provide overnight respite services under this section from receiving State funds or participating in any government insurance plan, including the Medicaid program, to the extent authorized or permitted under applicable State or federal law.

The Department shall charge each adult day care and each adult day health facility seeking to provide overnight respite services a nonrefundable initial licensure fee of three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00) and a nonrefundable annual renewal licensure fee in the amount of three hundred fifteen dollars ($315.00).

History.

2015-241, s. 12G.3(a).

§ 131D-7.
Waiver of rules for certain adult care homes providing shelter or services during disaster or emergency.

The Division of Health Service Regulation may temporarily waive, during disasters or emergencies declared in accordance with Article 1A of Chapter 166A of the General Statutes, any rules of the Commission pertaining to adult care homes to the extent necessary to allow the adult care home to provide temporary shelter and temporary services requested by the emergency management agency. The Division may identify, in advance of a declared disaster or emergency, rules that may be waived, and the extent the rules may be waived, upon a disaster or emergency being declared in accordance with Article 1A of Chapter 166A of the General Statutes. The Division may also waive rules under this subsection during a declared disaster or emergency upon the request of an emergency management agency and may rescind the waiver if, after investigation, the Division determines the waiver poses an unreasonable risk to the health, safety, or welfare of any of the persons occupying the adult care home. The emergency management agency requesting temporary shelter or temporary services shall notify the Division within 72 hours of the time the preapproved waivers are deemed by the emergency management agency to apply.

As used in this section, “emergency management agency” is as defined in

G.S. 166A-19.3

.

History.

1999-307, s. 2; 2007-182, s. 1; 2012-12, s. 2(s).

Cross References.

As to emergency management efforts, generally, see

G.S. 166A-19

et seq.

§ 131D-7.1.
(Effective April 1, 2022) Secretary to establish visitation protocols during declared disasters and emergencies.

As used in this section and in

G.S. 131D-7.2

, the following terms have the following meanings:

Disaster declaration. — As defined in

G.S. 166A-19.3(3)

.

Emergency. — As defined in

G.S. 166A-19.3(6)

.

Facility. — An adult care home, including a family care home, licensed under this Article.

Normal visitation policy. — The visitation policy that was in effect at a facility on January 1, 2020.

The Secretary shall, in consultation with licensed operators of adult care homes, including family care homes, and any other stakeholders the Secretary deems relevant, establish visitation protocols for residents of these facilities that will become effective during a disaster declaration or emergency that results in the suspension or curtailment of a facility’s normal visitation policy for any reason. The visitation protocols shall provide for at least the following:

Each resident shall have the right to designate one preapproved visitor and one preapproved alternate visitor. The preapproved visitor, or if the preapproved visitor is unavailable, the preapproved alternate visitor, shall be allowed to visit the resident at least twice per month during any period of time during which the facility’s normal visitation policy is suspended or curtailed for any reason during the declared disaster or emergency.

Prior to admission, each facility shall explain and provide to each resident written notification of the visitation protocols established by the Secretary under this section.

Visitation under these protocols shall be subject to Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services directives and to the guidelines, conditions, and limitations established by the facility as part of its normal visitation policy.

History.

2021-145, s. 3(a).

§ 131D-7.2.
(Effective April 1, 2022) Resident visitation rights for adult care homes, including family care homes, during a disaster declaration or emergency.

Notwithstanding any provision of this Part, Chapter 166A of the General Statutes, or any other provision of law to the contrary, the visitation protocols established by the Secretary under

G.S. 131D-7.1

shall be in effect during any period of time when (i) there is a declared disaster or emergency and (ii) an adult care home, including a family care home, licensed under this Article suspends or restricts the normal visitation policy for any reason.

History.

2021-145, s. 3(a).

§§ 131D-7.3, 131D-7.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 131D-7.5.
Patient visitation rights for adult care home residents and special care unit residents.

Any facility licensed under this Chapter shall allow residents to receive visitors of their choice to the fullest extent permitted under the infection and prevention control program of the facility and applicable guidelines or orders issued by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the Department, local health departments, or any other government public health agency.

In the event the Department finds an adult care home has violated any rule, regulation, guidance, directive, or law relating to a resident’s visitation rights, the Department may issue a warning to the facility about the violation and give the facility not more than 24 hours to allow visitation. If visitation is not allowed after the 24-hour warning period, the Department shall impose a civil penalty in an amount not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each instance on each day the facility was found to have a violation. This civil penalty shall be in addition to any licensure action, fine, or civil penalty that the Department may impose pursuant to this Chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, in the event that circumstances require the complete closure of a facility to visitors, the facility shall use its best efforts to develop alternate visitation protocols that would allow visitation to the greatest extent safely possible. If those alternate protocols are found by the Department, the local health departments, or any other government public health agency to violate any rule, regulation, guidance, or federal law relating to a resident’s visitation rights, the Department may impose a civil penalty in an amount not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each instance on each day the facility was found to have a violation. This civil penalty shall be in addition to any licensure action, fine, or civil penalty that the Department may impose pursuant to this Chapter.

Each facility shall provide notice of the patient visitation rights in this act to residents and, when possible, family members of residents. The required notice shall also include the contact information for the agency or individuals tasked with investigating violations of adult care home resident visitation.

Subject to, and to the fullest extent permitted by, any rules, regulations, or guidelines adopted by either the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or any federal law, each facility shall allow compassionate care visits. The facility may require compassionate care visitors to submit to health screenings necessary to prevent the spread of infectious diseases, and, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the facility may restrict a compassionate care visitor who does not pass a health screening requirement or who has tested positive for an infectious disease. The facility may require compassionate care visitors to adhere to infection control procedures, including wearing personal protective equipment. Compassionate care situations that require visits include, but are not limited to, the following:

End-of-life situations.

A resident who was living with his or her family before recently being admitted to the facility is struggling with the change in environment and lack of physical family support.

A resident who is grieving after a friend or family member recently passed away.

A resident who needs cueing and encouragement with eating or drinking, previously provided by family or caregivers, is experiencing weight loss or dehydration.

A resident, who used to talk and interact with others, is experiencing emotional distress, seldom speaking, or crying more frequently when the resident had rarely cried in the past.

History.

2021-171, s. 5; 2021-181, s. 2(d), (e).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-171 provides in its preamble: “Whereas, the COVID-19 pandemic has caused great uncertainty and anxiety across our State and has significantly affected patients and residents in health care facilities; and

“Whereas, health care facilities have made many efforts to keep patients and employees in a safe environment and have endeavored to minimize, to the extent possible, the risk of spread of the coronavirus disease; and

“Whereas, as a result of COVID-19 prevention measures, many unintended consequences have occurred to patients and residents of these facilities who were not diagnosed with COVID-19; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly has become aware of numerous patients and residents of health care facilities across our State who were not diagnosed with COVID-19, but as a result of visitation policies have been prohibited from having any visitors, including a spouse, parent, close family member, guardian, health care agent, or caregiver; and

“Whereas, many families have been unable to be physically present with their loved ones while in a hospital, nursing home, combination home, hospice care, adult care home, special care unit, or residential treatment setting for mental illness, developmental or intellectual disability, or substance use disorder, and have been limited to electronic video communications, if any, with the patient; and

“Whereas, the patients and residents who have been affected in the above-described manner have included adults, minors, and individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly finds that it is in the interest of the State and its residents that these patients and residents of health care facilities, in compliance with the rules, regulations, and guidelines of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and federal law, should not be denied visitation by visitors of their choosing throughout the period of hospitalization or residential treatment; Now, therefore,”

Session Laws
2021-171, s. 1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The No Patient Left Alone Act.’” This section became effective November 1, 2021.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-181, s. 2(d), (e), in subsection (c), substituted “facility” for “hospice”; and in subsection (e), in the introductory language, substituted “Subject to, and to the fullest extent permitted by, any rules, regulations, or guidelines adopted by either the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or any federal law, each” for “Each”.

§ 131D-8.
Adult care home special care units; disclosure of information required.

An adult care home licensed under this Part that provides care for persons in special care units as defined in

G.S. 131D-4.6

shall disclose the form of care or treatment provided that distinguishes the special care unit as being especially designed for residents with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias, a mental health disability, or other special needs disease or condition. The disclosure shall be in writing and shall be made to all of the following:

The Department as part of its licensing procedures.

Each person seeking placement within a special care unit, or the person’s authorized representative, prior to entering into an agreement with the person to provide special care.

The Office of State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, annually, or more often if requested.

Information that must be disclosed in writing shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

A statement of the overall philosophy and mission of the licensed facility and how it reflects the special needs of residents with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias, a mental health disability, or other special needs disease or condition.

The process and criteria for placement, transfer, or discharge to or from the special care unit.

The process used for assessment and establishment of the plan of care and its implementation, including how the plan of care is responsive to changes in the resident’s condition.

Staffing ratios and how they meet the resident’s need for increased care and supervision.

Staff training that is dementia-specific.

Physical environment and design features that specifically address the needs of residents with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias.

Frequency and type of programs and activities for residents of the special care unit.

Involvement of families in resident care, and availability of family support programs.

Additional costs and fees to the resident for special care.

As part of its license renewal procedures and inspections, the Department shall examine for accuracy the written disclosure of each adult care home subject to this section. Substantial changes to written disclosures shall be reported to the Department at the time the change is made.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting an adult care home that does not offer a special care unit from admitting a person with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias, a mental health disability, or other special needs disease or condition. The disclosures required under this section apply only to an adult care home that advertises, markets, or otherwise promotes itself as providing a special care unit for persons with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias.

As used in this section, the term “special care unit” has the same meaning as applies under

G.S. 131D-4.6

.

History.

1999-334, s. 2.1; 1999-456, s. 61(a).